Washington statutes.
RCW 19.130.030

Certain advertising media—Application of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter applies to a radio station, television station, publisher, printer, or distributor of a newspaper, magazine, billboard, or other advertising medium which accepts advertising in good faith without knowledge of its violation of any provision of this chapter.

[ 1984 c 275 s 3.]